Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 36

Geologist Licensure Act of 2007

62-36-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Geologist Licensure Act of 2007.”

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-102. Legislative findings — Purpose.

The general assembly finds that the competent and proper application of geologic principles by geologists is vital to the lives, property, economy, security and environment of the people of this state. In order to safeguard life, health and property and to promote the public welfare, the practice of geology in this state is declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. Furthermore, the practice of geology is declared a learned profession to be practiced and regulated as such, and its practitioners in this state shall be held accountable to the state and members of the public by high professional standards in keeping with the ethics and practices of other learned professions in this state.

The purpose of this chapter is to introduce additional qualifying criteria in a professional field at present only partially regulated, thereby benefiting the safety, health and property of the people of this state and promoting the public welfare. The fields of geology expected to benefit are those related to the environment, mineral and fuels exploration and development, geologic hazards, basic geologic research and other geologic matters of concern to the people of this state.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Geologist” means a person qualified by education and practical experience to engage in the practice of geology;

“Geologist in training” means a person who has met the educational requirements of § 62-36-109, but is not qualified to be licensed as a professional geologist;

“Geology” means the science concerning the earth and its history, including:

The investigation, prediction of existence and location of:

Minerals;

Rocks;

Liquids, including groundwater; and

Gases;

The natural processes that cause developments and changes in the earth; and

The applied science that uses knowledge of the earth and its constituent rocks, minerals, liquids, gases and other materials for the benefit of mankind;

“Licensed professional geologist” means a person who is licensed as a geologist under this chapter;

“Practice of geology” means providing geological services, except as specifically exempted by this chapter. Geological services include consultation, investigation, including the collection, removal and analysis of samples of minerals, rocks, fluids, gases and paleontological specimens, survey, evaluation, planning, mapping, inspection of work in the field of geology and the responsible supervision of work in the field of geology. The practice of geology means the practice of any branch of the profession of geology;

“Responsible charge of work” means accountable, independent control and direction by the use of initiative, skill and independent judgment of geological work or supervision of geological work; and

“Subordinate” means any person who assists a licensed professional geologist in the practice of geology without assuming the responsible charge of work.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-104. Prohibited activities.

No person shall:

Prepare any geologic plans, reports or documents other than a licensed professional geologist or a subordinate under the geologist's direction;

Practice geology in this state unless the person is licensed under this chapter. A certificate of licensure is not transferable;

Offer to practice geology in this state unless the person is licensed under this chapter. To offer to practice geology in this state includes the making of a verbal claim, displaying a sign or other advertisement, using letterhead, printing cards or using in connection with a person's name any title or description stating or implying that the person is a licensed professional geologist;

Seal or stamp any plans, plats, reports or other documents with the seal or stamp of a licensed professional geologist, or use in any manner the title licensed professional geologist or the title of any licensed certified specialty geologist unless licensed or licensed and certified under this chapter;

Affix the person's signature, seal or stamp to any geologic plans, plats, reports or other documents after that person's licensure has expired or has been suspended or revoked, unless the person's licensure has been renewed or reissued;

Give any false or forged evidence of any kind to the department when seeking to obtain the person's certificate of licensure;

Falsely impersonate any other licensee of like or different name; or

Attempt to use an expired or revoked certificate of licensure or continue to practice geology at any time during a period during which the department has suspended or revoked the person's certificate of licensure.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-105. Contracting for services only with licensed geologists.

This state and any county, municipality, agency, board, district, commission, authority or other political subdivision of the state shall only contract for geological services with persons licensed under this chapter or with a firm employing a licensed professional geologist who is in responsible charge of providing the services, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-106. Exemptions.

Any person, except a person exempted by this chapter, who practices or offers to practice geology in this state, including a person employed by the state or its political subdivisions, is subject to this chapter. The following are exempt:

Any person engaged solely in teaching the science of geology or engaged solely in nonpublic geologic research in this state; however, a teacher or researcher shall be certified as a licensed professional geologist if the teacher or researcher wishes to perform any geologic work or services for which licensure as a geologist is required by this chapter;

An employee or subordinate of a licensed professional geologist, as long as the employee or subordinate acts solely in that capacity. This exemption shall not permit any such employee or subordinate to practice geology independently or use the term licensed professional geologist; and

Any person who is employed either by the state or by a person, firm or corporation not engaged in the practice of geology, if the person provides geologic services to the employer only and not to the general public.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-107. Sole proprietorships, partnerships and corporations — Construction of chapter with other related professions.

A sole proprietorship, partnership or corporation that provides geological services as its primary activity may engage in the practice of geology; provided, that at least one (1) principal or officer is in responsible charge of the activity and is a licensed professional geologist. A sole proprietorship, partnership or corporation whose primary activity is other than the practice of geology may offer geological services; provided, that a licensed professional geologist is in responsible charge of the activity. The exemptions of § 62-36-106 shall apply to sole proprietorships, partnerships, and corporations.

This chapter shall not be construed to prevent or to affect:

The practice of any profession or trade related to geology for which a license or registration is required under any other law of this state; provided, that the work is permitted under the applicable licensing or registration law;

The right of licensed professional engineers to lawfully practice foundation engineering, geotechnical engineering, soils mechanics or other professional engineering as provided by chapter 2 of this title; or

Registered architects lawfully practicing architecture as provided by chapter 2 of this title.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-108. Application for licensure — Fee — Transcript.

An application for licensure as a geologist shall indicate the applicant's education and provide a detailed summary of geologic work. The application shall be accompanied by an application fee fixed by the department and shall include a certified transcript.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-109. Minimum qualifications.

To be eligible for a certificate of licensure, an applicant shall meet each of the following minimum qualifications:

Be a graduate of an accredited college or university. The applicant shall have successfully completed a minimum of thirty (30) semester or forty-five (45) quarter hours of course work in geology, geophysics, geochemistry, engineering geology or their subdivisions. The department may waive the academic requirements for a person who is a geologist; provided, that application for licensure is made no later than January 1, 2009, and the applicant can provide evidence to satisfy the department that the applicant is competent to practice geology;

Have at least five (5) years of geological education and professional experience. Any combination of the following kinds of education and experience qualify toward accumulating the required five (5) years:

Each year of graduate study shall count as one (1) year of experience; provided, that credit for graduate study or graduate courses, individually or in any combination of graduate study and courses, shall in no case exceed a total of two (2) years toward meeting the five-year requirement of this subdivision (a)(2);

Each year of teaching or geological research by persons teaching upper-level geology courses at the college or university levels; provided, that the teaching or research can be demonstrated to be of a sufficiently responsible nature to be equivalent to a year of professional experience; and

The geologic ability of an applicant shall be demonstrated by the applicant performing professional geologic work in a responsible position as determined by the department. The adequacy of the required supervision and experience shall be determined by the department in accordance with rules promulgated by the department; and

Has successfully passed any examination or examinations developed or determined by the department to assess adequately the knowledge and skills that are common to the competent practice of geology as a profession. The department shall waive the examination requirement for licensure as a geologist for an applicant who makes written application to the department no later than January 1, 2009, and who otherwise meets the requirements of this subsection (a).

Any person who holds an active certificate as a registered geologist or licensed professional geologist under the Geologists Registration Act of 1988, formerly compiled in this chapter, prior to January 1, 2008, shall be deemed to have met the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)-(3). The person shall be issued a certificate of licensure when renewal is due under the established renewal cycle upon applying for and meeting all requirements for renewal. The department shall assign the registration number of the registration certificate as the certificate of licensure number.

Any person holding an active certificate as a registered geologist or licensed professional geologist prior to January 1, 2008, who does not renew the certificate when renewal is due shall be required to apply for licensure under this chapter and meet all requirements of subsection (a), except that a reasonable period of time shall be accorded by the department for late renewals.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-110. Licensure or registration in foreign jurisdiction.

A person holding a license or registered to practice geology issued by proper authority of a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia or any foreign country, on the basis of comparable licensing or registration requirements and who, in the opinion of the department otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter, based on verified evidence, may, upon approval of an application for licensure, be licensed without further examination; provided, that the state, agency or country issuing the license or certificate of registration has entered into a reciprocity agreement with the department, is part of a general reciprocity agreement among all applicable states or has established some other form of mutual recognition of licensure or comity with the department.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-111. Certificate of licensure.

The department shall issue a certificate of licensure, upon payment of a fee prescribed by the department, to any applicant who complies with the requirements of this chapter. Certificates of licensure shall state the full name of the licensee, bear a certificate of licensure number and be signed by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee under the seal of the department.

A certificate of licensure shall be valid for a period of two (2) years. A fee prescribed by the department shall be imposed for each late certificate of licensure renewal.

A new certificate of licensure may be issued to replace any certificate of licensure lost, destroyed or mutilated, subject to the rules of the department and payment of a fee prescribed by the department.

Upon a written request accompanied by a fee prescribed by the department for change in status, a licensee shall be placed on retired or inactive status. No retired or inactive licensee shall engage in any geologic work or services for which licensure as a geologist is required by this chapter. The department shall prescribe rules outlining the procedure for placing a licensee on retired or inactive status and subsequent reinstatement to active status.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-112. Licensee's seal.

A licensed professional geologist, upon issuance of a certificate of licensure, shall obtain a seal of the design authorized by the department, bearing the licensee's name and the legend “licensed professional geologist” and identifying the state of Tennessee. All drawings, reports or other geologic papers or documents involving geologic work, as defined in this chapter, that have been prepared or approved by a licensed geologist or a subordinate employee under the geologist's direction for the use of or for delivery to any person or for public record within this state, shall be signed by the licensee and impressed with the licensee's seal. These acts shall indicate a licensee's responsibility for the drawings, reports or other geologic papers or documents.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-113. Advisory committee for geology.

The commissioner may establish an advisory committee for geology composed of seven (7) members.

In making appointments to the committee, the commissioner shall strive to ensure that the committee includes at least one (1) female, at least one (1) member of a racial minority and at least one (1) person who is at least sixty (60) years of age. The commissioner may also strive to ensure that the geologist members are from each of the following professional groupings: environmental, mineral and fuel exploration and development, geologic hazards and geologic research.

The committee shall be administratively attached to the department's division of regulatory boards.

Committee members shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual travel and other expenses incurred in attending each meeting and in performing any other duties provided for in this chapter. All reimbursement for expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The committee shall assist the commissioner with the promulgation of rules for the implementation of the requirements of this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-114. Powers and duties of department.

In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the department shall:

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this chapter in compliance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5;

Design and adopt an official seal for licensed professional geologists;

Set the amount of all fees required by this chapter;

Identify and approve continuing education programs for persons regulated by the department under this chapter. The department may prescribe regulations requiring continuing education as a prerequisite for renewal of certificates of licensure;

Receive, administer and account for all moneys derived under this chapter and transfer these funds to the state treasurer, who shall keep the moneys in a fund to be known as the “geologist and soil scientist regulatory fund”. The fund shall be used to defray expenses incurred in the administration of the Soil Scientist Licensure Act of 2009, compiled in chapter 18, part 2 of this title, and this chapter;

Prepare, administer and grade examinations required by this chapter. The department shall have the authority to adopt or recognize, in part or in whole, examinations prepared, administered or graded by other organizations, on a regional or national basis, that the department determines are appropriate to measure the qualifications of an applicant for licensure as a geologist; provided, that the examination questions and correct answers, and any individual applicant's completed examination, are available to the department, and that the department retains the authority to determine a passing grade for purposes of licensure in this state; and

Have other powers and duties that are necessary to effectuate this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 15; 2014, ch. 921, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-115. Public records of proceedings — Registration of applicants.

The department shall keep a public record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for licensure.

All official records of the department or affidavits by the commissioner as to the contents of the records shall be prima facie evidence of all matters required to be kept in the records.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, the following shall be treated as confidential and may not be disclosed except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction or by permission of the applicant:

Applications and other personal information submitted by applicants, except to the applicant, the department, its staff or the advisory committee; and

Information submitted by a reference concerning an applicant, except to the department, its staff or the advisory committee.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

62-36-116. Roster of licensees.

The department shall publish a roster semiannually showing the names and places of business of all geologists licensed in this state. Copies of this roster shall be placed on file with the secretary of state and the offices of the Tennessee division of geology and furnished to any licensee upon request free of charge or to the public upon request and payment of a fee, not to exceed cost, to be established by the department.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-117. Code of professional conduct.

The department shall promulgate a code of professional conduct that shall be made known in writing to every licensee and applicant for licensure under this chapter. The department may revise and amend this code of ethics from time to time and shall immediately notify each licensee in writing of any revision or amendments.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-118. Complaints against licensees.

Any person may file a complaint with the commissioner against a licensee alleging fraud, deceit, gross neglect, incompetence or misconduct. Complaints shall be made in writing.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-119. Suspension, revocation or refusal to renew license — Hearings — Administrative and judicial review — Injunctions — Governmental immunity.

The department shall have the power to suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the certificate of licensure of any licensee who:

Is found to have been convicted of:

Any fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate of licensure;

Any felony or any crime involving moral turpitude. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title; or

Any unlawful act as set forth in this chapter; or

Is found guilty of fraud, deceit, gross neglect, incompetence or misconduct in the practice of geology as a licensed professional geologist.

Any action by the department to suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a certificate of licensure shall be taken after a hearing held in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Any administrative or judicial review of such action shall likewise be in accordance with the procedures set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The department may seek relief at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any act or practice in violation of this chapter or of any rule promulgated to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine such a suit. No bond shall be required for the prosecution of the suit or for the issuance of an injunction.

Members of the department are officers of the state in carrying out the duties imposed by this chapter and as such have the full measure of governmental immunity provided by law.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 20; 2018, ch. 745, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-120. Reissue of revoked license.

The department may reissue a certificate of licensure to any person whose certificate of licensure has been revoked upon written application to the department by the applicant, showing good cause to justify reissuance.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-121. Legal counsel.

Legal counsel shall be provided by the division of regulatory boards.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, was repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

62-36-122. Violations — Penalties.

A violation of this chapter is a Class B misdemeanor.

In addition to or in lieu of any other lawful disciplinary action under this chapter, the commissioner may assess a civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation. All penalties owed under this chapter shall be paid to the department for deposit into the treasury of the state and shall accrue to the state and may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the state in any court of record in the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred.

Any civil penalty shall be assessed in the following manner:

A notice of the assessment shall be sent to the person receiving it by certified mail, return receipt requested;

Any person against whom an assessment has been issued may petition the commissioner for a review of the assessment;

The petition for review shall be in writing and shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the notice of assessment is received;

If a petition for review of the assessment is not filed within thirty (30) days after the date the notice is received, then the violator shall be deemed to have consented to the assessment and it shall become final; and

If a petition for review of the assessment is filed as provided by this section, then the proceedings on the appeal shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, with respect to the conduct of contested cases.

Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 36, §§ 62-36-101 — 62-36-111 and 62-36-120 (Acts 1988, ch. 553, §§ 1-7; T.C.A., § 62-36-107; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 189, 190; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1990, ch. 741, §§ 1-6; 1992, ch. 548, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, §§ 1, 3), concerning geologists, is repealed effective January 1, 2008, by Acts 2007, ch. 495, § 1, which also enacted a new title 62, ch. 36 effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.